ko: 의류/액세서리 > 핸드백/지갑 액세서리: 가방 밑판 및 보호대; 백 참; 가방 인서트 및 오거나이저; 가방 스트랩 및 핸들; 열쇠고리; 끈; 핸드백 훅 및 행거; 지갑 체인
sl-SI: Oblačila in dodatki > Dodatki za torbice in denarnice: Podstavki in zaščitni dodatki za torbe; Obeski za torbe; Vložki in organizatorji za torbe; Pasovi in ročaji za torbe; Obeski za ključe; Obešanke za okoli vratu; Kavlji in obešalniki za torbice; Verige za denarnico
nl: Kleding en accessoires > Accessoires voor handtassen en portefeuilles: Tasbodems en -beschermers; Tasbedels; Tasinzetstukken en -organizers; Tasriemen en -hengsels; Sleutelhangers; Sleutelkoorden; Tashaken en -hangers; Portefeuillekettingen
pt-BR: Vestuário e acessórios > Acessórios para bolsas e carteiras: Bases e protetores para bolsas; Pingentes para bolsas; Organizadores e divisórias para bolsas; Alças para bolsas; Chaveiros; Correias de pescoço; Ganchos e suportes para bolsas; Correntes de carteira
en: Apparel & Accessories > Handbag & Wallet Accessories: Bag Bases & Protectors; Bag Charms; Bag Inserts & Organizers; Bag Straps & Handles; Keychains; Lanyards; Purse Hooks & Hangers; Wallet Chains
zh-CN: 服饰与配饰 > 手提包/钱包配件: 包包底板与保护套; 包包装饰挂件; 包中包与收纳内胆; 包带与提手; 钥匙链; 挂绳; 挂包扣与挂包架; 钱包链
hr-HR: Odjeća i modni dodaci > Dodaci za torbe i novčanike: Podloge i zaštitnici za torbe; Privjesci za torbe; Umetci i organizatori za torbe; Remeni i ručke za torbe; Privjesci za ključeve; Uzice; Kuke i vješalice za torbice; Lanci za novčanike
es: Ropa y accesorios > Accesorios para bolsos y billeteras: Bases y protectores para bolsos; Dijes para bolsos; Insertos y organizadores para bolsos; Correas y asas para bolsos; Llaveros; Cintas; Ganchos y colgadores para bolsos; Cadenas de bolsillo
sv: Kläder och accessoarer > Accessoarer till handväskor och plånböcker: Väskbottnar och skydd; Väskberlocker; Väskinsatser och organisatörer; Väskremmar och handtag; Nyckelringar; Snoddar; Väskkrokar och hängare; Plånbokskedjor
nb: Klær og tilbehør > Tilbehør til vesker og lommebøker: Veskebunner og beskyttere; Veskeanheng; Veskeinnsatser og organisatorer; Veskestropper og håndtak; Nøkkelringer; Nøkkelbånd; Veskeoppheng; Lenker til lommebøker
de: Bekleidung & Accessoires > Handtaschen & Geldbörsenaccessoires: Taschenböden & -schoner; Taschenanhänger; Taschen-Organizer & -Einsätze; Taschengurte & -henkel; Schlüsselanhänger; Tragebänder; Taschenhaken & -aufhänger; Brieftaschenketten
ru: Одежда, обувь и аксессуары > Аксессуары для сумок и кошельков: Дно и защитные накладки для сумок; Брелоки для сумок; Вкладыши и органайзеры для сумок; Ремни и ручки для сумок; Брелоки для ключей; Ремешки; Крючки и держатели для сумок; Цепочки для кошельков
zh-TW: 服飾與配件 > 手提包和皮夾配件: 包包底托與保護套; 包包吊飾; 包包內袋與收納袋; 包包背帶與提把; 鑰匙圈; 短吊繩; 包包掛勾; 腰鍊
sk-SK: Oblečenie a doplnky > Doplnky ku kabelkám a peňaženkám: Základne a chrániče tašiek; Prívesky na tašky; Vložky a organizéry do tašiek; Popruhy a držiaky na tašky; Kľúčenky; Šnúrky; Háčiky a vešiaky na kabelky; Retiazky na peňaženky
th: เสื้อผ้าและเครื่องประดับ > อุปกรณ์กระเป๋าถือและกระเป๋าเงิน: ฐานและอุปกรณ์ป้องกันกระเป๋า; เครื่องประดับห้อยกระเป๋า; กระเป๋าจัดระเบียบ; สายและหูกระเป๋า; พวงกุญแจ; สายคล้อง; ที่แขวนกระเป๋า; สายกระเป๋าเงิน
it: Abbigliamento e accessori > Accessori per borsette e portafogli: Fondi e protezioni per borse; Ciondoli per borse; Inserti e organizer per borse; Tracolle e manici per borse; Portachiavi; Cordini; Ganci e appendiborse; Catene per portafogli
fi: Vaatteet ja asusteet > Käsilaukku- ja lompakkotarvikkeet: Laukun pohjat ja suojat; Laukkukorut; Laukunjärjestäjät ja -sisäosat; Laukun hihnat ja sangat; Avainketjut; Kaulanauhat; Laukun koukut ja pidikkeet; Lompakkoketjut
fr: Vêtements et accessoires > Accessoires pour sacs à main et portefeuilles: Fonds et protections de sac; Bijoux de sac; Organisateurs de sac; Bandoulières et anses de sac; Porte-clés; Cordons; Accroche-sacs; Chaînes pour portefeuille
vi: Quần áo & Phụ kiện > Túi cầm tay & các phụ kiện ví: Đế và miếng bảo vệ túi xách; Phụ kiện treo túi xách; Túi lót và dụng cụ sắp xếp túi xách; Quai và tay cầm túi xách; Dây móc chìa khóa; Dây đeo cổ/đeo tay; Móc treo ví; Dây xích ví
lt-LT: Apranga ir aksesuarai > Rankinių ir piniginių aksesuarai: Krepšių pagrindai ir apsaugos; Krepšių pakabukai; Krepšių įdėklai ir organizatoriai; Krepšių dirželiai ir rankenos; Raktų pakabukai; Juostos; Rankinės kabliukai ir pakabos; Grandinės piniginėms
tr: Kıyafet ve Aksesuarlar > El Çantası ve Cüzdan Aksesuarları: Çanta tabanları ve koruyucuları; Çanta süsleri; Çanta içi düzenleyiciler; Çanta askıları ve sapları; Anahtarlık Halkaları; Askı İpleri; Çanta kancaları ve askıları; Cüzdan Zincirleri
bg-BG: Облекло и аксесоари > Аксесоари за чанти и портфейли: Основи и протектори за чанти; Талисмани за чанти; Вложки и органайзери за чанти; Презрамки и дръжки за чанти; Ключодържатели; Връзки за врат; Кукички и закачалки за чанти; Вериги за портфейли
pt-PT: Acessórios e vestuário > Acessórios de malas e carteiras: Bases e protetores de mala; Pendentes de mala; Divisórias e organizadores de mala; Alças e pegas de mala; Chaveiros; Lanyards; Ganchos e suportes de mala; Correntes de carteira
ro-RO: Îmbrăcăminte și accesorii > Accesorii pentru genți și portofele: Baze și protecții pentru genți; Pandantive decorative pentru genți; Inserții și organizatoare pentru genți; Curele și mânere pentru genți; Brelocuri; Șnururi; Cârlige și suporturi pentru poșete; Lanțuri pentru portofele
cs: Oblečení a doplňky > Doplňky ke kabelkám a peněženkám: Dna a chrániče na tašky; Ozdoby na kabelky; Vložky a organizéry do tašek; Popruhy a ucha k taškám; Přívěsky na klíče; Šňůrky na krk; Háčky a věšáky na kabelky; Řetízky k peněženkám
ja: ファッション・アクセサリー > ハンドバッグ・財布用小物: バッグの底板・プロテクター; バッグチャーム; バッグインバッグ; バッグのストラップ・持ち手; キーチェーン; ネックストラップ; バッグハンガー; ウォレットチェーン
da: Tøj og tilbehør > Tilbehør til håndtasker og pengepunge: Taskebunde og -beskyttere; Taskevedhæng; Taskeindsatser og -organisatorer; Taskestropper og -hanke; Nøgleringe; Halssnore; Taskekroge og -ophæng; Kæder til pengepunge
hu: Ruházat és kiegészítők > Kézitáska- és pénztárca-kiegészítők: Táskaaljak és védők; Táskadíszek; Táskarendezők és betétek; Táskapántok és fogantyúk; Kulcstartók; Nyakpántok; Táskaakasztók és tartók; Pénztárcaláncok
pl: Ubrania i akcesoria > Akcesoria do torebek i portfeli: Spody i ochraniacze do toreb; Breloki do toreb; Wkłady i organizery do toreb; Paski i rączki do toreb; Breloczki; Smycze; Haczyki i wieszaki na torebki; Łańcuchy do portfela
el: Ένδυση και αξεσουάρ > Αξεσουάρ τσάντας χειρός & πορτοφολιού: Βάσεις και προστατευτικά τσάντας; Διακοσμητικά τσάντας; Ένθετα και θήκες οργάνωσης τσάντας; Λουριά και λαβές τσάντας; Μπρελόκ; Κορδόνια/ιμάντες λαιμού; Γάντζοι και κρεμάστρες τσάντας; Αλυσίδες πορτοφολιού